it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali > Sci e snowboard > Attacchi snowboard: Scarpe con cinturini alla caviglia per attacchi da snowboard; Piastre base per attacchi da snowboard; Cricchetti e cinghie dentate per attacchi da snowboard; Dischi per attacchi da snowboard; Minuteria per attacchi da snowboard; Attacchi per snowboard; Fasce anteriori per attacchi da snowboard
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla > Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas > Snieglenčių apkaustų dalys: Snieglenčių apkaustų kulkšnies dirželiai; Snieglenčių apkaustų pagrindo plokštelės; Snieglentės apkaustų sagtys ir dirželiai; Snieglenčių tvirtinimų diskai; Snieglenčių tvirtinimų varžtai ir detalės; Snieglenčių apkaustų aukštosios nugarėlės; Snieglenčių tvirtinimų pirštų dirželiai
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten > Skisport & Snowboarden > Zubehör Snowboard-Bindungen: Knöchelriemen für Snowboardbindungen; Grundplatten für Snowboardbindungen; Schnallen & Zahnriemen für Snowboardbindungen; Discs für Snowboardbindungen; Befestigungsteile für Snowboardbindungen; Highbacks für Snowboardbindungen; Zehenriemen für Snowboardbindungen
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว > สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด > อะไหล่ binding สโนว์บอร์ด: สายรัดยึดข้อเท้ากับสโนว์บอร์ด; แผ่นรองฐานที่ยึดกับสโนว์บอร์ด; หัวเข็มขัดและสายรัดแบบขั้นบันไดไบดิ้งสโนว์บอร์ด; แผ่นดิสก์ไบดิ้งสโนว์บอร์ด; ฮาร์ดแวร์ไบดิ้งสโนว์บอร์ด; ที่รัดด้านหลังเท้ากับสโนว์บอร์ด; สายรัดปลายเท้าไบดิ้งสโนว์บอร์ด
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動 > 單/雙板滑雪 > 滑雪板固定器零件: 單板滑雪繞踝綁帶; 滑雪板固定底板; 單板滑雪板固定器扣具與齒條; 單板滑雪板固定器轉盤; 單板滑雪板固定器配件; 滑雪板固定器; 單板滑雪板固定器腳趾帶
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno > Esqui e snowboard > Peças de fixadores de snowboard: Faixas de fixação de tornozelo para snowboard; Placas de fixação para snowboard; Fivelas e tiras dentadas para fixações de snowboard; Discos para fixações de snowboard; Equipamento para fixações de snowboard; Highbacks fixadores de snowboard; Correias de biqueira para fixações de snowboard
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông > Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết > Phụ kiện bộ nẹp giày cho ván trượt tuyết: Dây đeo mắt cá chân gắn với ván trượt tuyết; Tấm đế gắn ván trượt tuyết; Khóa và dây tăng đơ ngàm gắn giày ván trượt tuyết; Đĩa ngàm gắn giày ván trượt tuyết; Phụ kiện lắp ráp ngàm gắn giày ván trượt tuyết; Bộ phận tựa cao gắn ván trượt tuyết; Dây quai mũi ngàm gắn giày ván trượt tuyết
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek > Síelés és snowboardozás > Snowboard-kötőalkatrészek: Snowboardkötő bokapántok; Snowboardkötő alaplemezek; Snowboardkötés-csatok és fogazott pántok; Snowboardkötés-tárcsák; Snowboardkötés-rögzítőelemek; Snowboardkötő hátsó rész; Snowboardkötés-orrpántok
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity > Lyžování a snowboarding > Díly na snowboardové vázání: Snowboardové vázání – strapy přes kotník; Snowboardové vázání – základny; Ráčny a ozubené pásky pro snowboardová vázání; Středové disky snowboardových vázání; Spojovací materiál pro snowboardová vázání; Snowboardové vázání – patky; Přední strapy snowboardových vázání
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset > Hiihto ja lumilautailu > Lumilautojen siteiden osat: Lumilautojen siteiden nilkkahihnat; Lumilautojen siteiden pohjalevyt; Lumilaudan siteiden soljet ja hammashihnat; Lumilaudan siteiden kiinnityskiekot; Lumilaudan siteiden asennustarvikkeet; Lumilautojen siteiden taustatuet; Lumilaudan siteiden varvashihnat
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter > Skid- och snowboardåkning > Delar till snowboardbindningar: Fotledsremmar till snowboardbindning; Basplattor till snowboardbindning; Spännen och stegremmar för snowboardbindningar; Monteringsdiskar för snowboardbindningar; Monteringsdetaljer för snowboardbindningar; Hälstöd till snowboardbindning; Tåremmar för snowboardbindningar
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri > Kayak ve Snowboard > Snowboard Bağlantı Parçaları: Snowboard Bağlama Ayak Bileği Askıları; Snowboard Bağlama Taban Plakaları; Snowboard bağlaması tokaları ve dişli kayışları; Snowboard bağlaması diskleri; Snowboard bağlaması donanımları; Snowboard Bağlama Highback'leri; Snowboard bağlaması burun kayışları
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă > Schi și snowboarding > Piese pentru legături placă de snowboard: Legături la gleznă pentru placă de snowboard; Plăci de bază pentru legături snowboard; Catarame și benzi pentru legăturile de snowboard; Discuri pentru legături de snowboard; Elemente de fixare pentru legături de snowboard; Elemente spate pentru legături snowboard; Curele de vârf pentru legături de snowboard
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti > Skijanje i snowboardanje > Dijelovi za vezove za snowboarde: Trake za vezanje gležnjeva za snowboarde; Podložne ploče za vezove za snowboarde; Kopče i nazubne trake za vezove za snowboard; Diskovi za vezove za snowboarde; Oprema za vezove za snowboarde; Highbackovi za vezove za snowboarde; Trake za vezanje nožnih prstiju za snowboarde
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter > Ski- og snowboardutstyr > Snowboardbindingsdeler: Ankelstropper for snowboardbindinger; Baseplater for snowboardbindinger; Spenner og jekkestropper for snowboardbindinger; Monteringsdisker for snowboardbindinger; Festemateriell for snowboardbindinger; Highbacks for snowboardbindinger; Tåstropper for snowboardbindinger
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno > Esqui e snowboarding > Bindings para snowboard: Tiras de tornozelo para amarração de snowboard; Placas de base para fixação de snowboard; Fivelas e tiras dentadas para fixações de snowboard; Discos para fixações de snowboard; Ferragens para fixações de snowboard; Spoilers para fixação de snowboard; Tiras de biqueira para fixações de snowboard
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities > Skiing & Snowboarding > Snowboard Binding Parts: Snowboard Binding Ankle Straps; Snowboard Binding Baseplates; Snowboard Binding Buckles & Ladders; Snowboard Binding Discs; Snowboard Binding Hardware; Snowboard Binding Highbacks; Snowboard Binding Toe Straps
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver > Ski et snowboard > Pièces de fixation pour snowboards: Sangles de cheville pour fixation de snowboard; Plaques de base pour fixations de snowboard; Boucles et crémaillères pour fixations de snowboard; Disques pour fixations de snowboard; Matériel pour fixations de snowboard; Pièce de fixation pour snowboards; Sangles avant pour fixations de snowboard
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ > スキー・スノーボード用品 > スノーボード用ビンディングパーツ: スノーボード用ビンディングアンクルストラップ; スノーボード用ビンディングベースプレート; スノーボードビンディング用バックル・ラダー; スノーボードビンディング用ディスク; スノーボードビンディング用ハードウェア; スノーボード用ビンディングハイバック; スノーボードビンディング用トーストラップ
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры > Лыжный спорт и сноубординг > Детали креплений для сноубордов: Верхние стрепы креплений для сноубордов; Базы креплений для сноубордов; Бакли и зубчатые ремешки для креплений сноуборда; Монтажные диски для креплений сноуборда; Крепежные элементы для креплений сноуборда; Хайбеки креплений для сноубордов; Передние стрепы для креплений сноуборда
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动 > 滑雪与单板滑雪 > 滑雪板固定器部件: 滑雪板固定脚踝带; 滑雪板固定底板; 单板滑雪固定器搭扣和齿条; 单板滑雪固定器圆盘; 单板滑雪固定器硬件; 滑雪板固定背板; 单板滑雪固定器脚趾绑带
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티 > 스키/스노보드 > 스노보드 바인딩 부품: 스노보드 바인딩 발목 스트랩; 스노보드 바인딩 베이스플레이트; 스노보드 바인딩 버클 및 래더; 스노보드 바인딩 디스크; 스노보드 바인딩 하드웨어; 스노보드 바인딩 하이백; 스노보드 바인딩 토 스트랩
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter > Ski og snowboard > Snowboardbindinger – dele: Snowboardbindinger – ankelstropper; Snowboardbindinger – bundplader; Spænder og tandremme til snowboardbindinger; Monteringsskiver til snowboardbindinger; Hardware til snowboardbindinger; Snowboardbindinger – highbacks; Tåremme til snowboardbindinger
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες > Σκι & σνόουμπορντ > Εξαρτήματα δεσίματος σνόουμπορντ: Λουριά αστραγάλων δεσίματος σνόουμπορντ; Βάσεις δεσίματος σνόουμπορντ; Πόρπες και ιμάντες για δέστρες snowboard; Δίσκοι για δέστρες snowboard; Υλικός εξοπλισμός για δέστρες snowboard; Πλάτες δεσίματος σνόουμπορντ; Λουράκια δακτύλων για δέστρες snowboard
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti > Smučanje in deskanje na snegu > Deli za vezi za deske: Trakovi za gležnje za vezi za snežne deske; Osnovne plošče za vezi za snežne deske; Zaponke in trakovi za snowboard vezi; Diski za vezi za snežne deske; Montažna oprema za vezi za snežne deske; Visoke opore za vezi za deske; Trakovi za prste za vezi za snežne deske
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности > Каране на ски и сноуборд > Части за сноуборд автомати: Каишки за глезен за сноуборд автомати; Основи за сноуборд автомати; Катарами и зъбни ленти за сноуборд автомати; Монтажни дискове за сноуборд автомати; Монтажни елементи за сноуборд автомати; Опори за петата на сноуборд автомати; Каишки за пръсти на сноуборд автомати
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą > Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie > Części do wiązań snowboardowych: Paski na kostki do wiązań snowboardowych; Płyty bazowe wiązań snowboardowych; Pompki i paski zębate do wiązań snowboardowych; Dyski do wiązań snowboardowych; Osprzęt do wiązań snowboardowych; Dźwignie wiązań snowboardowych; Paski przednie do wiązań snowboardowych
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity > Lyžovanie a snowboarding > Diely viazania na snowboard: Popruhy okolo členkov na snowboard; Stredové disky viazania na snowboard; Spony a popruhy na snowboardové viazanie; Diskové viazanie na snowboard; Súčiastky viazania na snowboard; Pätky viazania na snowboard; Popruhy na špičku pri viazaní na snowboard
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten > Skiën en snowboarden > Bevestigingen voor snowboard: Bevestigingsenkelstraps voor snowboard; Bevestigingsbasisplaten voor snowboard; Gespen en ladders voor snowboardbindingen; Schijven voor snowboardbindingen; Hardware voor snowboardbindingen; Bevestigingshighbacks voor snowboard; Teenstraps voor snowboardbindingen
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno > Esquí y snowboard > Piezas para fijaciones de snowboard: Correas de tobillo para fijaciones de snowboard; Placas base para fijaciones de snowboard; Hebillas y correas dentadas para fijaciones de snowboard; Discos para fijaciones de snowboard; Herrajes para fijaciones de snowboard; Espaldera para fijaciones de snowboard; Correas de puntera para fijaciones de snowboard